Wisconsin, session 2025, SB891.
do enact as follows:SB891,14Section 1. 29.753 (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB891,2,3529.753 Importation of wild elk. (intro.) Notwithstanding ss. 95.20 and 195.55 (6) (a) and (b) and rules promulgated under those provisions, the department 2may import and move elk and introduce the elk into Ashland, Bayfield, Jackson, 3Price, or Sawyer county if all of the following apply:SB891,24Section 2. 29.753 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB891,2,8529.753 (3) The department of agriculture, trade and consumer protection 6determines that the applicable requirements related to chronic wasting disease 7under ss. 95.20 and 95.55 (6) (a) and (b) are met to the fullest extent possible and 8practical with wild and free-roaming elk.SB891,39Section 3. 95.23 (5) of the statutes is created to read:SB891,2,131095.23 (5) The department may not effect the quarantine of an animal that 11belongs to a species that is known to neither carry nor be susceptible to chronic 12wasting disease based solely on an incident of the animal having been exposed to 13chronic wasting disease.SB891,414Section 4. 95.55 (6) (c) of the statutes is created to read:SB891,2,181595.55 (6) (c) Notwithstanding pars. (a) and (b) 1., the department may not 16effect the quarantine of a farm-raised deer belonging to the species Dama dama 17based solely on an incident of the farm-raised deer having been exposed to chronic 18wasting disease.SB891,2,1919